extras/dictionaries/la.aff
SFX B Y 2020
SFX B o       o               eo        
SFX B o       oque            eo        
SFX B o       one             eo        
SFX B o       ove             eo        
SFX B o       s               eo        
SFX B o       sque            eo        
SFX B o       sne             eo        
SFX B o       sve             eo        
SFX B o       t               eo        
SFX B o       tque            eo        
SFX B o       tne             eo        
SFX B o       tve             eo        
SFX B o       mus             eo        
SFX B o       musque          eo        
SFX B o       musne           eo        
SFX B o       musve           eo        
SFX B o       tis             eo        
SFX B o       tisque          eo        
SFX B o       tisne           eo        
SFX B o       tisve           eo        
SFX B o       nt              eo        
SFX B o       ntque           eo        
SFX B o       ntne            eo        
SFX B o       ntve            eo        
SFX B o       bam             eo        
SFX B o       bamque          eo        
SFX B o       bamne           eo        
SFX B o       bamve           eo        
SFX B o       bas             eo        
SFX B o       basque          eo        
SFX B o       basne           eo        
SFX B o       basve           eo        
SFX B o       bat             eo        
SFX B o       batque          eo        
SFX B o       batne           eo        
SFX B o       batve           eo        
SFX B o       bamus           eo        
SFX B o       bamusque        eo        
SFX B o       bamusne         eo        
SFX B o       bamusve         eo        
SFX B o       batis           eo        
SFX B o       batisque        eo        
SFX B o       batisne         eo        
SFX B o       batisve         eo        
SFX B o       bant            eo        
SFX B o       bantque         eo        
SFX B o       bantne          eo        
SFX B o       bantve          eo        
SFX B o       bo              eo        
SFX B o       boque           eo        
SFX B o       bone            eo        
SFX B o       bove            eo        
SFX B o       bis             eo        
SFX B o       bisque          eo        
SFX B o       bisne           eo        
SFX B o       bisve           eo        
SFX B o       bit             eo        
SFX B o       bitque          eo        
SFX B o       bitne           eo        
SFX B o       bitve           eo        
SFX B o       bimus           eo        
SFX B o       bimusque        eo        
SFX B o       bimusne         eo        
SFX B o       bimusve         eo        
SFX B o       bitis           eo        
SFX B o       bitisque        eo        
SFX B o       bitisne         eo        
SFX B o       bitisve         eo        
SFX B o       bunt            eo        
SFX B o       buntque         eo        
SFX B o       buntne          eo        
SFX B o       buntve          eo        
SFX B o       am              eo        
SFX B o       amque           eo        
SFX B o       amne            eo        
SFX B o       amve            eo        
SFX B o       as              eo        
SFX B o       asque           eo        
SFX B o       asne            eo        
SFX B o       asve            eo        
SFX B o       at              eo        
SFX B o       atque           eo        
SFX B o       atne            eo        
SFX B o       atve            eo        
SFX B o       amus            eo        
SFX B o       amusque         eo        
SFX B o       amusne          eo        
SFX B o       amusve          eo        
SFX B o       atis            eo        
SFX B o       atisque         eo        
SFX B o       atisne          eo        
SFX B o       atisve          eo        
SFX B o       ant             eo        
SFX B o       antque          eo        
SFX B o       antne           eo        
SFX B o       antve           eo        
SFX B o       rem             eo        
SFX B o       remque          eo        
SFX B o       remne           eo        
SFX B o       remve           eo        
SFX B o       res             eo        
SFX B o       resque          eo        
SFX B o       resne           eo        
SFX B o       resve           eo        
SFX B o       ret             eo        
SFX B o       retque          eo        
SFX B o       retne           eo        
SFX B o       retve           eo        
SFX B o       remus           eo        
SFX B o       remusque        eo        
SFX B o       remusne         eo        
SFX B o       remusve         eo        
SFX B o       retis           eo        
SFX B o       retisque        eo        
SFX B o       retisne         eo        
SFX B o       retisve         eo        
SFX B o       rent            eo        
SFX B o       rentque         eo        
SFX B o       rentne          eo        
SFX B o       rentve          eo        
SFX B eo      e               eo        
SFX B eo      eque            eo        
SFX B eo      ene             eo        
SFX B eo      eve             eo        
SFX B o       te              eo        
SFX B o       teque           eo        
SFX B o       tene            eo        
SFX B o       teve            eo        
SFX B eo      eto             eo        
SFX B eo      etoque          eo        
SFX B eo      etone           eo        
SFX B eo      etove           eo        
SFX B o       tote            eo        
SFX B o       toteque         eo        
SFX B o       totene          eo        
SFX B o       toteve          eo        
SFX B o       nto             eo        
SFX B o       ntoque          eo        
SFX B o       ntone           eo        
SFX B o       ntove           eo        
SFX B o       re              eo        
SFX B o       reque           eo        
SFX B o       rene            eo        
SFX B o       reve            eo        
SFX B o       ndum            eo        
SFX B o       ndumque         eo        
SFX B o       ndumne          eo        
SFX B o       ndumve          eo        
SFX B o       ndi             eo        
SFX B o       ndique          eo        
SFX B o       ndine           eo        
SFX B o       ndive           eo        
SFX B o       ndo             eo        
SFX B o       ndoque          eo        
SFX B o       ndone           eo        
SFX B o       ndove           eo        
SFX B o       ns              eo        
SFX B o       nsque           eo        
SFX B o       nsne            eo        
SFX B o       nsve            eo        
SFX B o       ntem            eo        
SFX B o       ntemque         eo        
SFX B o       ntemne          eo        
SFX B o       ntemve          eo        
SFX B o       ntis            eo        
SFX B o       ntisque         eo        
SFX B o       ntisne          eo        
SFX B o       ntisve          eo        
SFX B o       nti             eo        
SFX B o       ntique          eo        
SFX B o       ntine           eo        
SFX B o       ntive           eo        
SFX B o       nte             eo        
SFX B o       nteque          eo        
SFX B o       ntene           eo        
SFX B o       nteve           eo        
SFX B o       ntes            eo        
SFX B o       ntesque         eo        
SFX B o       ntesne          eo        
SFX B o       ntesve          eo        
SFX B o       ntium           eo        
SFX B o       ntiumque        eo        
SFX B o       ntiumne         eo        
SFX B o       ntiumve         eo        
SFX B o       ntibus          eo        
SFX B o       ntibusque       eo        
SFX B o       ntibusne        eo        
SFX B o       ntibusve        eo        
SFX B o       ntia            eo        
SFX B o       ntiaque         eo        
SFX B o       ntiane          eo        
SFX B o       ntiave          eo        
SFX B o       or              eo        
SFX B o       orque           eo        
