extras/dictionaries/la.dic
abemo/B
abiungo/B
abolesco/B
abscido/B
absterreo/B
accado/B
accieo/B
accudo/B
acuo/B
adcido/B
addoceo/B
adflecto/B
adfulgeo/B
adgredior/B
adiicio/B
adinsurgo/B
adlicio/B
admaneo/B
adnecto/B
adpello/B
adpono/B
adquiro/B
adscalpo/B
adsero/B
adsterno/B
adsudesco/B
adtero/B
adtorqueo/B
adulesco/B
advesperasco/B
affaveo/B
affodio/B
aggemo/B
albeo/B
alisco/B
allido/B
alluo/B
ambedo/B
amplecto/B
animadverto/B
antecedo/B
antepolleo/B
apo/B
appendo/B
apprehendo/B
arboresco/B
arguo/B
arveho/B
aspicio/B
assido/B
assugo/B
astringo/B
attingo/B
attribuo/B
augesco/B
averro/B
benedico/B
boo/B
calfacio/B
calvesco/B
caneo/B
capisso/B
cavefacio/B
certisso/B
circumago/B
circumcolo/B
circumfodio/B
circuminicio/B
circummetior/B
circumplecto/B
circumsedeo/B
circumspicio/B
circumtergeo/B
circumtundo/B
clango/B
cludo/B
coarguo/B
cogo/B
coimbibo/B
collaudo/ABS
collino/B
colluo/B
commaneo/B
comminuo/B
commordeo/B
compasco/B
competo/B
compleo/B
comprendo/B
concalefacio/B
concerpo/B
concrebresco/B
concurro/B
condisco/B
conecto/B
confingo/B
confrango/B
congaudeo/B
congruo/B
conlibeo/B
conlubeo/B
conmalleo/B
conmingo/B
conmolo/B
connascor/B
conpasco/B
conpeto/B
conpleo/B
conpromitto/B
conquino/B
conrodo/B
consedeo/B
consisto/B
consterno/B
consubsido/B
consuo/B
contenebrasco/B
contineo/B
contraho/B
contremo/B
convalesco/B
convinco/B
convorto/B
corrado/B
corrumpo/B
cresco/B
cupisco/B
decano/B
decineresco/B
decurro/B
defendo/B
defingo/B
defrango/B
defuro/B
dehibeo/B
delibuo/B
delitesco/B
deminuo/B
densesco/B
depecto/B
deplango/B
deprendo/B
dequeror/B
deripio/B
desculpo/B
desipio/B
despuo/B
desudesco/B
detepesco/B
detorqueo/B
deuro/B
devigesco/B
diduco/B
diffugio/B
dilido/B
dimitto/B
dirigo/B
discerpo/B
discredo/B
disicio/B
dispasco/B
dispicio/B
disrumpo/B
dissolvo/B
distero/B
ditesco/B
doleo/B
ebibo/B
ecfingo/B
ecfrigo/B
ecnubo/B
educo/B
effingo/B
effrigo/B
egeo/B
elactesco/B
eligo/B
elugeo/B
emineo/B
emorior/B
enitor/B
eripio/B
evalesco/B
everto/B
evorto/B
exardeo/B
excandefacio/B
excerpo/B
excondo/B
exequor/B
exfutuo/B
eximo/B
exorbeo/B
expendo/B
expingo/B
exposco/B
exquiro/B
exsiccesco/B
exsplendesco/B
extabesco/B
extollo/B
extruo/B
exurgeo/B
faetesco/B
faveo/B
fervefacio/B
figo/B
flammesco/B
floresco/B
foveo/B
frigefacio/B
fruor/B
fungor/B
gemesco/B
glaciesco/B
granasco/B
hebeo/B
hisco/B
iacio/B
illabor/B
illiquor/B
immadesco/B
immorior/B
impendeo/B
impleo/B
inaccresco/B
inardeso/B
incandesco/B
incido/B
incognosco/B
incurro/B
indilucesco/B
indouco/B
inferveo/B
infloresco/B
infudo/B
ingero/B
inhaeresco/B
iniuvenesco/B
inluceo/B
inmineo/B
inmunio/B
inpallesco/B
inpingo/B
inprimo/B
inrideo/B
inscribo/B
insido/B
inspicio/B
instruo/B
intelligo/B
intercedo/B
interficio/B
interfuro/B
interlateo/B
intermaneo/B
internosco/B
interrumpo/B
intersterno/B
interveho/B
intingo/B
intribuo/B
introspicio/B
inturgesco/B
invalisco/B
invilesco/B
irrepo/B
iungo/B
lambisco/B
leo/B
loquor/B
madeo/B
maturasco/B
misceo/B
morior/B
nefacio/B
Nivomagus/B
obcino/B
obfigo/B
obliscor/B
obrelinquo/B
obsorbeo/B
obtendo/B
obverto/B
ocquinisco/B
oppando/B
opulesco/B
pario/B
pellego/B
percallesco/B
percupio/B
pereffluo/B
perfundo/B
perlateo/B
permereo/B
perpendo/B
perscisco/B
perstrepo/B
pertexo/B
pervello/B
phthisisco/B
pleo/B
portendo/B
praecello/B
praecurro/B
praefodio/B
praeinfundo/B
praemordeo/B
praeplecto/B
praespargo/B
praetercurro/B
praetingo/B
praevideo/B
procumbo/B
progeno/B
promereor/B
propono/B
prosterno/B
provolvo/B
purpuresco/B
rabo/B
recano/B
recolo/AB
recrudesco/B
reduco/B
refrondesco/B
relego/B
remergo/B
renitor/B
repingo/B
reputesco/B
resisto/B
resumo/B
retorqueo/B
Reudigni/B
reviresco/B
rodo/B
sarpo/B
scopo/B
sentisco/B
sisto/B
spicio/B
stilasco/B
subcerno/B
subfervefacio/B
subindo/B
submitto/B
subpono/B
subscribo/B
subtaceo/B
subtero/B
subvolvo/B
suffarcino/BPS
sumo/B
supercino/B
superextollo/B
superimpendo/B
superinspicio/B
supernascor/B
supersido/B
superurgeo/B
suppleo/B
surringor/B
taedesco/B
tergeo/B
torpefacio/B
transago/B
transgero/B
transpono/B
transvorto/B
tuor/B
uro/B
vegeo/B
veterasco/B
vireo/B
